Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4619
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act:

(1) 340B drug means a drug that a 340B entity may purchase at a reduced price pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b, as such section existed on January 1, 2025;

(2) 340B entity means a covered entity as defined in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4), as such section existed on January 1, 2025; and

(3) Manufacturer has the same meaning as in section 71-7438.

Laws 2025, LB168, § 2.